Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-112
Usury; relief; tender of principal unnecessary.

Relief to the complaining party in case of an usurious loan may be given without payment or tender by him of the principal sum.

Laws 1879, § 7, p. 115;

R.S.1913, § 3352;

C.S.1922, § 2840;

C.S.1929, § 45-107;

R.S.1943, § 45-112.